Tables/Contraction/ko.ctb
always ᄀ 4
always ᄁ 4-4
always ᄂ 14
always ᄃ 24
always ᄄ 24-24
always ᄅ 5
always ᄆ 15
always ᄇ 45
always ᄈ 45-45
always ᄉ 6
always ᄊ 6-6
always ᄋ 2356
always ᄌ 46
always ᄍ 46-46
always ᄎ 56
always ᄏ 124
always ᄐ 125
always ᄑ 145
always ᄒ 245
always ᄓ 14-4
always ᄔ 14-14
always ᄕ 14-24
always ᄖ 14-45
always ᄗ 24-4
always ᄘ 5-14
always ᄙ 5-5
always ᄚ 5-245
always ᄛ 5
always ᄜ 15-45
always ᄝ 15
always ᄞ 45-4
always ᄟ 45-14
always ᄠ 45-24
always ᄡ 45-6
always ᄢ 45-6-4
always ᄣ 45-6-24
always ᄤ 45-6-45
always ᄥ 45-6-6
always ᄦ 45-6-46
always ᄧ 45-46
always ᄨ 45-56
always ᄩ 45-125
always ᄪ 45-145
always ᄫ 45
always ᄬ 45-45
always ᄭ 6-4
always ᄮ 6-14
always ᄯ 6-24
always ᄰ 6-5
always ᄱ 6-15
always ᄲ 6-45
always ᄳ 6-45-4
always ᄴ 6-6-6
always ᄵ 6-2356
always ᄶ 6-46
always ᄷ 6-56
always ᄸ 6-124
always ᄹ 6-125
always ᄺ 6-145
always ᄻ 6-245
always ᅁ 4
always ᅂ 24
always ᅃ 15
always ᅄ 45
always ᅅ 6
always ᅇ 2356-2356
always ᅈ 46
always ᅉ 56
always ᅊ 125
always ᅋ 145
always ᅍ 46-2356
always ᅒ 56-124
always ᅓ 56-245
always ᅖ 145-45
always ᅗ 145
always ᅘ 245-245
always ᅟ 0
always ᅠ 0
always ᅡ 126
always ᅢ 1235
always ᅣ 345
always ᅤ 345-1235
always ᅥ 234
always ᅦ 1345
always ᅧ 156
always ᅨ 34
always ᅩ 136
always ᅪ 1236
always ᅫ 1236-1235
always ᅬ 13456
always ᅭ 346
always ᅮ 134
always ᅯ 1234
always ᅰ 1234-1235
always ᅱ 134-1235
always ᅲ 146
always ᅳ 246
always ᅴ 2456
always ᅵ 135
always ᅶ 126-136
always ᅷ 126-134
always ᅸ 345-136
always ᅹ 345-346
always ᅺ 234-136
always ᅻ 234-134
always ᅼ 234-246
always ᅽ 156-136
always ᅾ 156-134
always ᅿ 136-234
always ᆀ 136-1345
always ᆁ 136-34
always ᆂ 136-136
always ᆃ 136-134
always ᆄ 346-345
always ᆅ 346-345-1235
always ᆆ 346-156
always ᆇ 346-136
always ᆈ 346-135
always ᆉ 134-126
always ᆊ 134-1235
always ᆋ 134-234-246
always ᆌ 134-34
always ᆍ 134-134
always ᆎ 146-126
always ᆏ 146-234
always ᆐ 146-1345
always ᆑ 146-156
always ᆒ 146-34
always ᆓ 146-134
always ᆔ 146-135
always ᆕ 246-134
always ᆖ 246-246
always ᆗ 2456-134
always ᆘ 135-126
always ᆙ 135-345
always ᆚ 135-136
always ᆛ 135-134
always ᆜ 135-246
always ᆨ 1
always ᆩ 1-1
always ᆪ 1-3
always ᆫ 25
always ᆬ 25-13
always ᆭ 25-356
always ᆮ 35
always ᆯ 2
always ᆰ 2-1
always ᆱ 2-26
always ᆲ 2-12
always ᆳ 2-3
always ᆴ 2-236
always ᆵ 2-256
always ᆶ 2-356
always ᆷ 26
always ᆸ 12
always ᆹ 12-3
always ᆺ 3
always ᆻ 3-3
always ᆼ 2356
always ᆽ 13
always ᆾ 23
always ᆿ 235
always ᇀ 236
always ᇁ 256
always ᇂ 356
always ᇃ 1-2
always ᇄ 1-3-1
always ᇅ 25-1
always ᇆ 25-35
always ᇇ 25-3
always ᇉ 25-236
always ᇊ 35-1
always ᇋ 35-2
always ᇌ 2-1-3
always ᇍ 2-25
always ᇎ 2-35
always ᇏ 2-35-356
always ᇐ 2-2
always ᇑ 2-26-1
always ᇒ 2-26-3
always ᇓ 2-12-3
always ᇔ 2-12-356
always ᇕ 2-12
always ᇖ 2-3-3
always ᇘ 2-235
always ᇚ 26-1
always ᇛ 26-2
always ᇜ 26-12
always ᇝ 26-3
always ᇞ 26-3-3
always ᇠ 26-23
always ᇡ 26-356
always ᇢ 26
always ᇣ 12-2
always ᇤ 12-256
always ᇥ 12-356
always ᇦ 12
always ᇧ 3-1
always ᇨ 3-35
always ᇩ 3-2
always ᇪ 3-12
always ᇬ 1
always ᇭ 1-1
always ᇮ 2356-2356
always ᇯ 235
always ᇳ 256-12
always ᇴ 256
always ᇵ 356-25
always ᇶ 356-2
always ᇷ 356-26
always ᇸ 356-12
always ㄱ 1
always ㄲ 1-1
always ㄳ 1-3
always ㄴ 25
always ㄵ 25-13
always ㄶ 25-356
always ㄷ 35
always ㄸ 35-35
always ㄹ 2
always ㄺ 2-1
always ㄻ 2-26
always ㄼ 2-12
always ㄽ 2-3
always ㄾ 2-236
always ㄿ 2-256
always ㅀ 2-356
always ㅁ 26
always ㅂ 12
always ㅃ 12-12
always ㅄ 12-3
always ㅅ 3
always ㅆ 3-3
always ㅇ 2356
always ㅈ 13
always ㅉ 13-13
always ㅊ 23
always ㅋ 235
always ㅌ 236
always ㅍ 256
always ㅎ 356
always ㅏ 126
always ㅐ 1235
always ㅑ 345
always ㅒ 345-1235
always ㅓ 234
always ㅔ 1345
always ㅕ 156
always ㅖ 34
always ㅗ 136
always ㅘ 1236
always ㅙ 1236-1235
always ㅚ 13456
always ㅛ 346
always ㅜ 134
always ㅝ 1234
always ㅞ 1234-1235
always ㅟ 134-1235
always ㅠ 146
always ㅡ 246
always ㅢ 2456
always ㅣ 135
always ㅤ 0
always ㅥ 25-25
always ㅦ 25-35
always ㅧ 25-3
always ㅩ 2-1-3
always ㅪ 2-35
always ㅫ 2-12-3
always ㅮ 26-12
always ㅯ 26-3
always ㅱ 26
always ㅲ 12-1
always ㅳ 12-35
always ㅴ 12-3-1
always ㅵ 12-3-35
always ㅶ 12-13
always ㅷ 12-236
always ㅸ 12
always ㅹ 12-12
always ㅺ 3-1
always ㅻ 3-25
always ㅼ 3-35
always ㅽ 3-12
always ㅾ 3-13
always ㆀ 2356-2356
always ㆄ 256
always ㆅ 356-356
always ㆇ 346-345
always ㆈ 346-345-1235
always ㆉ 346-135
always ㆊ 146-156
always ㆋ 146-34
always ㆌ 146-135
always ㈀ 1
always ㈁ 25
always ㈂ 35
always ㈃ 2
always ㈄ 26
always ㈅ 12
always ㈆ 3
always ㈇ 2356
always ㈈ 13
always ㈉ 23
always ㈊ 235
always ㈋ 236
always ㈌ 256
always ㈍ 356
always ㈎ 1-126
always ㈏ 25-126
always ㈐ 35-126
always ㈑ 2-126
always ㈒ 26-126
always ㈓ 12-126
always ㈔ 3-126
always ㈕ 126
always ㈖ 13-126
always ㈗ 23-126
always ㈘ 235-126
always ㈙ 236-126
always ㈚ 256-126
always ㈛ 356-126
always ㈜ 13-134
always ㉠ 1
always ㉡ 25
always ㉢ 35
always ㉣ 2
always ㉤ 26
always ㉥ 12
always ㉦ 3
always ㉧ 2356
always ㉨ 13
always ㉩ 23
always ㉪ 235
always ㉫ 236
always ㉬ 256
always ㉭ 356
always ㉮ 1-126
always ㉯ 25-126
always ㉰ 35-126
always ㉱ 2-126
always ㉲ 26-126
always ㉳ 12-126
always ㉴ 3-126
always ㉵ 126
always ㉶ 13-126
always ㉷ 23-126
always ㉸ 235-126
always ㉹ 236-126
always ㉺ 256-126
always ㉻ 356-126
always 가 4-126
always 각 4-126-1
always 갂 4-126-1-1
always 갃 4-126-1-3
always 간 4-126-25
always 갅 4-126-25-13
always 갆 4-126-25-356
always 갇 4-126-35
always 갈 4-126-2
always 갉 4-126-2-1
always 갊 4-126-2-26
always 갋 4-126-2-12
always 갌 4-126-2-3
always 갍 4-126-2-236
always 갎 4-126-2-256
always 갏 4-126-2-356
always 감 4-126-26
always 갑 4-126-12
always 값 4-126-12-3
always 갓 4-126-3
always 갔 4-126-3-3
always 강 4-126-2356
always 갖 4-126-13
always 갗 4-126-23
always 갘 4-126-235
always 같 4-126-236
always 갚 4-126-256
always 갛 4-126-356
always 개 4-1235
always 객 4-1235-1
always 갞 4-1235-1-1
always 갟 4-1235-1-3
always 갠 4-1235-25
always 갡 4-1235-25-13
always 갢 4-1235-25-356
always 갣 4-1235-35
always 갤 4-1235-2
always 갥 4-1235-2-1
always 갦 4-1235-2-26
always 갧 4-1235-2-12
always 갨 4-1235-2-3
always 갩 4-1235-2-236
always 갪 4-1235-2-256
always 갫 4-1235-2-356
always 갬 4-1235-26
always 갭 4-1235-12
always 갮 4-1235-12-3
always 갯 4-1235-3
always 갰 4-1235-3-3
always 갱 4-1235-2356
always 갲 4-1235-13
always 갳 4-1235-23
always 갴 4-1235-235
always 갵 4-1235-236
always 갶 4-1235-256
always 갷 4-1235-356
always 갸 4-345
always 갹 4-345-1
always 갺 4-345-1-1
always 갻 4-345-1-3
always 갼 4-345-25
always 갽 4-345-25-13
always 갾 4-345-25-356
always 갿 4-345-35
always 걀 4-345-2
always 걁 4-345-2-1
always 걂 4-345-2-26
always 걃 4-345-2-12
always 걄 4-345-2-3
always 걅 4-345-2-236
always 걆 4-345-2-256
always 걇 4-345-2-356
always 걈 4-345-26
always 걉 4-345-12
always 걊 4-345-12-3
always 걋 4-345-3
always 걌 4-345-3-3
always 걍 4-345-2356
always 걎 4-345-13
always 걏 4-345-23
always 걐 4-345-235
always 걑 4-345-236
always 걒 4-345-256
always 걓 4-345-356
always 걔 4-345-1235
always 걕 4-345-1235-1
always 걖 4-345-1235-1-1
always 걗 4-345-1235-1-3
always 걘 4-345-1235-25
always 걙 4-345-1235-25-13
always 걚 4-345-1235-25-356
always 걛 4-345-1235-35
always 걜 4-345-1235-2
always 걝 4-345-1235-2-1
always 걞 4-345-1235-2-26
always 걟 4-345-1235-2-12
always 걠 4-345-1235-2-3
always 걡 4-345-1235-2-236
always 걢 4-345-1235-2-256
always 걣 4-345-1235-2-356
always 걤 4-345-1235-26
always 걥 4-345-1235-12
always 걦 4-345-1235-12-3
always 걧 4-345-1235-3
always 걨 4-345-1235-3-3
always 걩 4-345-1235-2356
always 걪 4-345-1235-13
always 걫 4-345-1235-23
always 걬 4-345-1235-235
always 걭 4-345-1235-236
always 걮 4-345-1235-256
always 걯 4-345-1235-356
always 거 4-234
always 걱 4-234-1
always 걲 4-234-1-1
always 걳 4-234-1-3
always 건 4-234-25
always 걵 4-234-25-13
always 걶 4-234-25-356
always 걷 4-234-35
always 걸 4-234-2
always 걹 4-234-2-1
always 걺 4-234-2-26
always 걻 4-234-2-12
always 걼 4-234-2-3
always 걽 4-234-2-236
always 걾 4-234-2-256
always 걿 4-234-2-356
always 검 4-234-26
always 겁 4-234-12
always 겂 4-234-12-3
always 것 4-234-3
always 겄 4-234-3-3
always 겅 4-234-2356
always 겆 4-234-13
always 겇 4-234-23
always 겈 4-234-235
always 겉 4-234-236
always 겊 4-234-256
always 겋 4-234-356
always 게 4-1345
always 겍 4-1345-1
always 겎 4-1345-1-1
always 겏 4-1345-1-3
always 겐 4-1345-25
always 겑 4-1345-25-13
always 겒 4-1345-25-356
always 겓 4-1345-35
always 겔 4-1345-2
always 겕 4-1345-2-1
always 겖 4-1345-2-26
always 겗 4-1345-2-12
always 겘 4-1345-2-3
always 겙 4-1345-2-236
always 겚 4-1345-2-256
always 겛 4-1345-2-356
always 겜 4-1345-26
always 겝 4-1345-12
always 겞 4-1345-12-3
always 겟 4-1345-3
always 겠 4-1345-3-3
always 겡 4-1345-2356
always 겢 4-1345-13
always 겣 4-1345-23
always 겤 4-1345-235
always 겥 4-1345-236
always 겦 4-1345-256
always 겧 4-1345-356
always 겨 4-156
always 격 4-156-1
always 겪 4-156-1-1
always 겫 4-156-1-3
always 견 4-156-25
always 겭 4-156-25-13
always 겮 4-156-25-356
always 겯 4-156-35
always 결 4-156-2
always 겱 4-156-2-1
always 겲 4-156-2-26
always 겳 4-156-2-12
always 겴 4-156-2-3
always 겵 4-156-2-236
always 겶 4-156-2-256
always 겷 4-156-2-356
always 겸 4-156-26
always 겹 4-156-12
always 겺 4-156-12-3
always 겻 4-156-3
always 겼 4-156-3-3
always 경 4-156-2356
always 겾 4-156-13
always 겿 4-156-23
always 곀 4-156-235
always 곁 4-156-236
always 곂 4-156-256
always 곃 4-156-356
always 계 4-34
always 곅 4-34-1
always 곆 4-34-1-1
always 곇 4-34-1-3
always 곈 4-34-25
always 곉 4-34-25-13
always 곊 4-34-25-356
always 곋 4-34-35
always 곌 4-34-2
always 곍 4-34-2-1
always 곎 4-34-2-26
always 곏 4-34-2-12
always 곐 4-34-2-3
always 곑 4-34-2-236
always 곒 4-34-2-256
always 곓 4-34-2-356
always 곔 4-34-26
always 곕 4-34-12
always 곖 4-34-12-3
always 곗 4-34-3
always 곘 4-34-3-3
always 곙 4-34-2356
always 곚 4-34-13
always 곛 4-34-23
always 곜 4-34-235
always 곝 4-34-236
always 곞 4-34-256
always 곟 4-34-356
always 고 4-136
always 곡 4-136-1
always 곢 4-136-1-1
always 곣 4-136-1-3
always 곤 4-136-25
always 곥 4-136-25-13
always 곦 4-136-25-356
always 곧 4-136-35
always 골 4-136-2
always 곩 4-136-2-1
always 곪 4-136-2-26
always 곫 4-136-2-12
always 곬 4-136-2-3
always 곭 4-136-2-236
always 곮 4-136-2-256
always 곯 4-136-2-356
always 곰 4-136-26
always 곱 4-136-12
always 곲 4-136-12-3
always 곳 4-136-3
always 곴 4-136-3-3
always 공 4-136-2356
always 곶 4-136-13
always 곷 4-136-23
always 곸 4-136-235
always 곹 4-136-236
always 곺 4-136-256
always 곻 4-136-356
always 과 4-1236
always 곽 4-1236-1
always 곾 4-1236-1-1
always 곿 4-1236-1-3
always 관 4-1236-25
always 괁 4-1236-25-13
always 괂 4-1236-25-356
always 괃 4-1236-35
always 괄 4-1236-2
always 괅 4-1236-2-1
always 괆 4-1236-2-26
always 괇 4-1236-2-12
always 괈 4-1236-2-3
always 괉 4-1236-2-236
always 괊 4-1236-2-256
always 괋 4-1236-2-356
always 괌 4-1236-26
always 괍 4-1236-12
always 괎 4-1236-12-3
always 괏 4-1236-3
always 괐 4-1236-3-3
always 광 4-1236-2356
always 괒 4-1236-13
always 괓 4-1236-23
always 괔 4-1236-235
always 괕 4-1236-236
always 괖 4-1236-256
always 괗 4-1236-356
always 괘 4-1236-1235
always 괙 4-1236-1235-1
always 괚 4-1236-1235-1-1
always 괛 4-1236-1235-1-3
always 괜 4-1236-1235-25
always 괝 4-1236-1235-25-13
always 괞 4-1236-1235-25-356
always 괟 4-1236-1235-35
always 괠 4-1236-1235-2
always 괡 4-1236-1235-2-1
always 괢 4-1236-1235-2-26
always 괣 4-1236-1235-2-12
always 괤 4-1236-1235-2-3
always 괥 4-1236-1235-2-236
always 괦 4-1236-1235-2-256
always 괧 4-1236-1235-2-356
always 괨 4-1236-1235-26
always 괩 4-1236-1235-12
always 괪 4-1236-1235-12-3
always 괫 4-1236-1235-3
always 괬 4-1236-1235-3-3
always 괭 4-1236-1235-2356
always 괮 4-1236-1235-13
always 괯 4-1236-1235-23
always 괰 4-1236-1235-235
always 괱 4-1236-1235-236
always 괲 4-1236-1235-256
always 괳 4-1236-1235-356
always 괴 4-13456
always 괵 4-13456-1
always 괶 4-13456-1-1
always 괷 4-13456-1-3
always 괸 4-13456-25
always 괹 4-13456-25-13
always 괺 4-13456-25-356
always 괻 4-13456-35
always 괼 4-13456-2
always 괽 4-13456-2-1
always 괾 4-13456-2-26
always 괿 4-13456-2-12
always 굀 4-13456-2-3
always 굁 4-13456-2-236
always 굂 4-13456-2-256
always 굃 4-13456-2-356
always 굄 4-13456-26
always 굅 4-13456-12
always 굆 4-13456-12-3
always 굇 4-13456-3
always 굈 4-13456-3-3
always 굉 4-13456-2356
always 굊 4-13456-13
always 굋 4-13456-23
always 굌 4-13456-235
always 굍 4-13456-236
always 굎 4-13456-256
always 굏 4-13456-356
always 교 4-346
always 굑 4-346-1
always 굒 4-346-1-1
always 굓 4-346-1-3
always 굔 4-346-25
always 굕 4-346-25-13
always 굖 4-346-25-356
